North Carolina, session 2025, SB693.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Article 14 of Chapter 143B of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 143B-1278. Compensation for services related to veterans' benefits matters.
(a) Definitions. – Unless the context requires otherwise, the following definitions apply
in this section:
(1) Compensation. – The payment of money, anything of value, or a financial
benefit.
(2) Veterans' benefits matter. – The preparation, presentation, or prosecution of a
claim affecting an individual who has filed or expressed an intent to file a
claim for a benefit, program, service, commodity, pension, function, or status,
the entitlement to which is determined under the laws and regulations
administered by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs or the
Department of Military and Veterans Affairs pertaining to veterans, their
dependents, their survivors and any other individual eligible for such benefits.
(b) Prohibitions. – A person shall not do any of the following:
(1) Receive compensation for preparation, presentation or prosecution of, or
advising, consulting, or assisting an individual with an initial disability claim
related to a veterans' benefits matter, except as permitted by this section.
(2) Receive compensation for referring an individual to another person to prepare,
present, prosecute, or advise, consult, or assist the individual with, a veterans'
benefits matter.
(3) Directly or by implication guarantee or advertise that any individual is certain
to receive specific veterans' benefits or that any individual is certain to receive
a specific level, percentage, or amount of veterans' benefits.
(4) A person seeking to receive compensation for advising, assisting, or
consulting any individual with any veterans' benefits matter or engaging in the
preparation of an initial claim for a fee shall not:
a. Aggressively or directly solicit business regarding any veterans'
benefit matter.
b. Gain direct access to any personal medical, financial, or government
benefits log in, username, or password information.
*S693-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(5) A person seeking to receive compensation for advising, assisting, or
consulting any individual with any veterans' benefits matter shall not utilize a
medical professional for a secondary medical exam with whom they have an
employment relationship.
(6) Enter into any agreement related to a veterans' benefits matter that does not
comply with subsection (c) of this section.
(c) Memorialization of terms. – Before rendering any services, a person seeking to
receive compensation for preparation, presentation or prosecution of, or advising, consulting or
assisting an individual with, a veterans' benefits matter shall memorialize all terms of the
agreement in a written agreement that complies with all the following criteria:
(1) The written agreement is signed by both parties and contains all terms
regarding the individual's payment of fees for services rendered including both
of the following:
a. Fees for services are contingent upon a successful outcome and shall
not exceed five times the one month increase in benefits.
b. No initial fee shall be charged.
(2) The written agreement must clearly provide at the outset of the business
relationship the following disclosure: "This business is not sponsored by, or
affiliated with, the United States Department of Veterans Affairs or the
Department of Military and Veterans Affairs, or any other federally chartered
veterans' service organization. Other organizations, including but not limited
to the Department of Military and Veterans Affairs, a local veterans' service
organization, and other federally chartered veterans' service organizations
may be able to provide you with this service free of charge. Products or
services offered by this business are not necessarily endorsed by any of these
organizations. You may qualify for other veterans' benefits beyond the
benefits for which you are receiving services here." This written disclosure
shall appear in at least 12-point font and shall appear in a readily noticeable
and identifiable place in the person's agreement with the individual seeking
services. This disclosure shall also be provided orally to the individual and the
individual shall verbally acknowledge understanding of the oral disclosure
and sign the document in which the written disclosure appears to represent
understanding of these provisions. The person offering services shall retain a
copy of the written disclosure while providing veterans' benefits services for
compensation to the individual and for at least one year after the date on which
the service relations terminate.
(d) Penalty. – A violation of this section constitutes a violation of the North Carolina
Unfair Trade Practices Act.
(e) Exclusions. – Nothing in this section shall apply to attorneys who are licensed to
practice in the State of North Carolina."
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective October 1, 2025.
Page 2 Senate Bill 693-First Edition